Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.460

Female genital mutilation—Minors—Prohibition on procedure.

(1) A health care provider licensed under this title shall not perform any procedure constituting female genital mutilation on a minor.

(2) A licensed health care provider who violates subsection (1) of this section is subject to discipline under this chapter.

(3) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Female genital mutilation" means any procedure performed for nonmedical reasons that involves partial or total removal of, or other injury to, the external female genitalia, including but not limited to a clitoridectomy or the partial or total removal of the clitoris or the prepuce or clitoral hood, excision or the partial or total removal (with or without excision of the clitoris) of the labia minora or the labia majora, or both, infibulation or the narrowing of the vaginal opening (with or without excision of the clitoris), or other procedures that are harmful to the external female genitalia, including pricking, incising, scraping, or cauterizing the genital area; and

(b) "Minor" means any person under the age of 18.

[ 2023 c 122 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2023 c 122: See notes following RCW 9A.36.170.